Hawaii statutes.
§576D-11 Staff. The attorney general
shall appoint, without regard to chapter 76:

(1) An administrator;

(2) An assistant administrator who shall serve as
controller and whose duties shall include but not be limited to designing and
implementing controls over all financial management systems, including
electronic data processing systems, and developing an appropriate staffing
plan;

(3) An assistant administrator who shall serve as the
policy administrator and whose duties shall include but not be limited to
developing and implementing comprehensive policy and planning documents to
guide operations to successful outcomes, including federal performance
reporting and interstate activities; and

(4) A staff attorney to serve as the supervisor of
the administrative process activities and staff.

In addition, the attorney general shall appoint,
pursuant to chapter 76, other personnel as may be required to discharge the
functions of the child support enforcement agency. The staff attorney shall
not be considered to be a deputy attorney general under chapter 28. [L 1986, c
332, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11; am L 1992, c 246,
§3; am L 1994, c 24, §3; am L 1995, c 137, §3; am L 1997, c 293, §30; am L
2002, c 253, §150; am L 2008, c 178, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next